Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1623
Minimal hazard potential, defined.

Minimal hazard potential means a hazard potential classification such that failure or misoperation of the dam would likely result in no economic loss beyond the cost of the structure itself and losses principally limited to the owner's property.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 23.